Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-885.54
Continuing education and training; rules and regulations.

The commission shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations necessary for the effective administration of sections 81-885.49 to 81-885.54 pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act. Such rules and regulations may include, but not be limited to, the establishment of minimum standards for schools, courses, and instructors.

Laws 1985, LB 101, § 10.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.